Maryland, session 2026, SB0689.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force to Study Postrelease Services and Requirements.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services, or the
Secretary’s designee; and
(4) the President of the Maryland State’s Attorneys’ Association, or the
President’s designee.
(c) The Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services shall be the chair of
the Task Force.
(d) The Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services shall provide staff
for the Task Force.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0689*

SENATE BILL 689
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:
(1) study:
(i) each type of release from incarceration in the State; and
(ii) for each type of release, postrelease programs and requirements
designed to prevent individuals released from incarceration from recidivating; and
(2) make recommendations for improving postrelease programming and
requirements based on its findings.
(g) On or before July 1, 2027, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.